Hawaii statutes.
§707-765 Extortion in the first degree.
(1) A person commits the offense of extortion in the first degree if the
person commits extortion:

(a) Of property, labor, or services the value of
which exceeds $200 in total during any twelve-month period; or

(b) By making or financing any extortionate
extension of credit, or by collecting any extension of credit by extortionate
means.

(2) Extortion in the first degree is a class B
felony. [L 1979, c 106, pt of §1; gen ch 1993; am L 2008, c 147, §5]

Case Notes

Evidence sufficient to convict defendant under this section;
evidence showed that victim borrowed $1,100 from brother and gave it to
defendant; when victim borrowed the money, it became victim's money. 103 H. 68
(App.), 79 P.3d 686 (2003).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next